Massachusetts, session 194th, H5446.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Town of 
Topsfield may adopt a by-law restricting the use of second generation anticoagulant rodenticides 
on private property in the town of Topsfield. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.